Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1276
Other facts required to be shown by affidavit; how proved.

Any other fact which is required to be shown by affidavit, and which may be required for future use in any action or other proceeding, may be proved by pursuing the course indicated in sections 25-1274 and 25-1275, as nearly as the circumstances of the case will admit.

R.S.1867, Code § 405, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7969;

C.S.1922, § 8910;

C.S.1929, § 20-1276;

R.S.1943, § 25-1276.